Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 659A.410 is amended to read:
659A.410. (1) Except as  provided in subsections (2) and (4) of this section, it is an unlawful
practice  under  ORS chapter 659A for a place of public accommodation offering goods or services,
or any person acting on behalf of such place, to:
(a) Refuse to accept from a customer or patron, as payment for goods and services, any  of the
following:
(A) United States coins.
(B) United States currency, including federal reserve bank notes  and circulating notes of federal
reserve banks and national banks.
(b) Make any distinction, discrimination or restriction because a customer  or patron offers any
of the following as payment for goods and services:
(A) United States coins.
(B) United States currency, including federal reserve bank notes  and circulating notes of federal
reserve banks and national banks.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection  (1) of this section, a place of public accommodation, or any per-
son acting on behalf of such place, may refuse to accept as payment for goods and services:
(a) United States coins, in any combination, in an amount equal to or greater than $100; or
(b) United States currency in denominations of $50 or $100.
(3) This section does not apply to:
(a) Farmers’ markets or roadside stands;
(b) Transactions occurring on aircraft;
(c) Transactions for goods or services involving a place or service offering  goods, services,
transient lodging or  transportation, when the transaction or a portion of the transaction requires
a customer or patron to deposit moneys or sign an agreement to rent or lease consumer goods;
(d) Any establishment that is owned  by or operated under the control of the United States
Government or an agency of the United States;
(e) Retail transactions that occur entirely over the telephone or by mail;
(f) Internet-based transactions;
(g) The purchase of diesel fuel or Class 1  flammable liquids at a filling station, service station,
garage or other dispensary where diesel fuel or Class 1  flammable liquids are dispensed and sold
Enrolled Senate Bill 1176 (SB 1176-INTRO) Page 1
at retail, during the  hours in which the filling station, service station, garage or dispensary is un-
attended by an owner, operator or other employee to  dispense the fuel or liquids or is attended by
only one owner, operator or other employee to dispense the fuel or liquids;
(h) Electric vehicle charging stations;
(i) Transactions that occur in a micro market, including purchases from a vending machine;
(j) Purchases from a vending machine, unless  the vending machine is located within a concen-
tration or cluster of more than eight vending machines  that do not accept coins or currency as
payment for purchases;
(k) Activities for which a license or certificate is required to transact insurance;
(L) A place  of public accommodation that provides hospital or medical services and that bills
or invoices a person after such  services are rendered, provided that the place of public accommo-
dation accepts coins and currency as payment  for the bill or invoice by mail or at a designated lo-
cation other than the location where the services are rendered;
(m) Any regional office of the Department of Revenue;
(n) A place of public accommodation that is  a branch or office of a bank holding company, fi-
nancial holding company, financial  institution or trust company or an affiliate of a bank holding
company, financial holding company, financial institution or trust company;
(o) Transactions for which a license is required under ORS 59.165;
(p) Transactions for which a license is required under ORS 86A.095 to  86A.198, 86A.200 to
86A.239 or 86A.303 to 86A.339;
(q) Escrow transactions for which a license is required under ORS 696.511;
(r) A licensee under ORS chapter 725;
(s) A membership-only retail establishment where goods and services are sold to members who
pay a recurring membership fee;
(t) On-street and off-street parking pay stations that accept either coins or currency  as one
method of payment; or
(u) On-street and off-street parking pay stations  that do not accept coins or currency, provided
that access to another pay station that accepts coins or currency as payment for the  parking is
made readily available to patrons.
(4) It is not a violation of subsection (1)  of this section for a place of public accommodation,
including a venue or  facility used for live entertainment or sporting events, to require patrons or
event attendees to make purchases at different points of sale  within the place of public accommo-
dation using a payment system that transfers or converts cash into  a cashless payment instrument,
including, but not  limited to, tokens, cards, wristbands or other instruments that are preloaded with
funds, provided that the place  of public accommodation does not charge a transaction fee for the
conversion or transfer of cash  to the cashless payment instrument or to refund any balance that
remains on the cashless payment instrument back to the patron or event attendee.
(5) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit, restrict or otherwise interfere with  the
ability of a place of public accommodation to:
(a) Accept, in addition to the forms of payment described under subsection (1) of  this section,
as payment for goods or services any other form of payment, provided that  such payment is not
prohibited under federal or state law;
(b) After services are rendered,  invoice or bill a customer or patron, or submit a claim to a third
party to receive payment for the services; or
(c) Offer a customer or patron an incentive for paying for goods or services in  coin or currency.
(6) A person who alleges a violation of subsection (1) of this  section may file a complaint with
the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries in the manner provided by ORS 659A.820.
(7) The Bureau of Labor and Industries shall  conduct an ongoing advertising and educa-
tion effort to publicize and explain the obligations set forth in subsection (1)  of this section
to places of public accommodation, to persons acting on behalf of  places of public accom-
modation and  to the public. The bureau’s effort shall use such methods and media as the
bureau determines will in a cost-effective manner reach the largest number of places  of
Enrolled Senate Bill 1176 (SB 1176-INTRO) Page 2
public accommodation  and residents of this state. The bureau shall continue the effort de-
scribed in this subsection until the bureau determines that a high level of compliance exists
among places of public  accommodation and persons acting on behalf of places of public ac-
commodation.
[(7)] (8) As used in this section:
(a) “Affiliate” means  any company that controls, is controlled by or is under common control
of another company.
(b) “Bank holding company,” “financial  holding company,” “financial institution” and “trust
company” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 706.008.
(c) “Class 1 flammable liquids” has the meaning given that term in ORS 480.310.
(d) “Consumer goods” has the meaning given that term in ORS 79.0102.
(e) “Escrow” has the meaning given that term in ORS 696.505.
(f)(A) “Internet-based transaction” means a transaction that occurs over  the Internet and that
involves a sale, purchase or reservation of  or deposit for goods or services to be picked up by, de-
livered to, shipped to or consumed by a customer or patron.
(B) “Internet-based transaction” does not mean an in-person transaction.
(g) “Micro market” means an unattended retail  establishment to which access by the general
public is restricted that offers whole or fresh-cut fruit and vegetables, packaged foods or  beverages
for purchase through an automated payment processing system.
(h) “Place of public accommodation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 659A.400.
(i) “Regional office”  means an office of the Department of Revenue other than a central office
or headquarters building located in Salem.
(j) “Transact insurance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 731.146.
(k) “Transient lodging” has the meaning given that term in ORS 699.005.
(L) “Vending machine” has the meaning given that term in ORS 624.310.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate April 1, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1176 (SB 1176-INTRO) Page 3